Hawaii statutes.
§612-14 Qualified jury wheel. (a)
Upon return of the juror qualification forms, the clerk, after careful
investigation in each case, shall select for prospective jury service all those
persons whom the clerk believes are qualified and not exempt; provided that any
person who is exempt may be selected if the person waives the person's
exemption.

(b) The names of the persons so selected shall
be placed in the qualified jury wheel, to be used in compiling lists of
prospective jurors subject to service during the ensuing year; provided that
the clerk, with the approval of the court, may excuse a prospective juror for
any cause set forth under section 612-7, in which case the name of the excused
person shall not be placed in the qualified jury wheel.

(c) The clerk may place in the qualified jury
wheel for further service the name of any person who, in the previous jury
year, wilfully or without reasonable excuse failed to appear as summoned. [L
1973, c 191, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 366, §7; am L 1996, c 136, §1;
am L 2007, c 122, §9]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next